Colorado, session 2026A, HB1317.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado has an economic and civic interest in ensuring that
Coloradans can access high-quality postsecondary opportunities;
(b) Higher education, workforce development, adult education, and
employment programs should empower every Coloradan to discover their
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

strengths, pursue their passions, meet the demands of a changing economy,
and build careers that provide economic security;
(c) Too many Coloradans get disconnected from workforce and
employment opportunity, and as a result, Colorado has struggled to train
and retain homegrown talent;
(d) Adult learners, trainees, and job seekers may need to enter or
reenter the workforce system from diverse points in their lives based on
current needs and life status;
(e) Today, Coloradans must navigate a complex postsecondary talent
development system of 472 schools, more than 300 apprenticeship
programs, more than 4,500 eligible training programs, 21 adult education
programs, and nearly 10,000 degree options;
(f) More than 20 divisions, offices, and units across seven state
entities deliver 110 programs and initiatives in the system;
(g) This fragmentation makes opportunity difficult to find for
Coloradans, and it limits the reach and impact of state investments;
(h) Colorado must bring together, streamline, and create seamless
connections between education and skill-building pathways for Coloradans;
(i) Colorado needs a purpose-built, unified department that can
easily connect all Coloradans, including underserved populations, to
opportunity through postsecondary education, skills training, and
employment;
(j) Reimagining our workforce system should include consideration
of the connection between health and human services programs,
out-of-school time programs, and workforce programs; and
(k) We must boldly reimagine how our education, training, and
employment systems are serving Colorado learners, job seekers, workers,
and employers.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 3 to article 38
of title 24 as follows:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

PART 3
POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM
TRANSITION ADVISORY COMMITTEE
24-38-301. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 3, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(1) "DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT
OF HIGHER EDUCATION CREATED IN SECTION 24-1-114.
(2) "TRANSITION COMMITTEE" MEANS THE POSTSECONDARY TALENT
DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM TRANSITION ADVISORY COMMITTEE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38-302.
(3) "TRANSITION PLAN" MEANS THE TRANSITION PLAN PREPARED BY
THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE AND SUBMITTED TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38-303.
24-38-302. Postsecondary talent development system transition
advisory committee - creation - membership - transition plan.
(1) THE POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM
TRANSITION ADVISORY COMMITTEE IS CREATED IN THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE.
THE PURPOSE OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE IS TO DEVELOP THE
TRANSITION PLAN DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-38-303 THAT INCLUDES
RECOMMENDATIONS TO INTEGRATE THE STATE'S DELIVERY OF PUBLIC
PROGRAMS AND SERVICES THAT SUPPORT COLORADANS PURSUING
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION, TRAINING, OR EMPLOYMENT.
(2) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
(a) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(b) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

DEVELOPMENT AND INTERNATIONAL TRADE, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S
DESIGNEE;
(d) THE DIRECTOR OF OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION APPOINTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 23-60-104 (2)(a)(II), OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE;
(e) THE CHAIR OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE COLORADO
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL;
(f) THE CHAIR OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER
EDUCATION;
(g) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL REPRESENTING LARGE BUSINESS WITH EXPERTISE
IN HUMAN RESOURCES, A TALENT OFFICER, OR ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL WITH
PROFESSIONAL EXPERIENCE RELATED TO WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
TALENT STRATEGY;
(III) TWO DIRECTORS REPRESENTING LOCAL WORKFORCE AREAS;
(IV) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PUBLIC FOUR-YEAR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION;
(V) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE;
(VI) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PUBLIC TWO-YEAR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION OR LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE;
(VII) A FACULTY MEMBER OF A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION WHOSE PRIMARY DUTIES INCLUDE TEACHING OR DIRECT
INSTRUCTION OF STUDENTS;
(VIII) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ADVOCACY GROUP THAT
ADVOCATES FOR PUBLIC EDUCATION;
(IX) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
ADVOCACY GROUP OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

(X) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP COUNCIL
CREATED IN SECTION 8-15.7-105;
(XI) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A GROUP APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING
COMMITTEE;
(XII) A REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM EMPLOYER SPONSOR;
AND
(XIII) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH EXPERIENCE ADMINISTERING
WORK-BASED LEARNING PROGRAMS IN K-12 EDUCATION OR ADVISING HIGH
SCHOOL STUDENTS ABOUT POSTSECONDARY OPPORTUNITIES;
(h) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PUBLIC FOUR-YEAR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN EDUCATIONAL ADVOCACY GROUP OR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION; AND
(III) A COUNTY COMMISSIONER OF A COUNTY THAT DELIVERS
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS.
(i) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PUBLIC TWO-YEAR INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION OR LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE; AND
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION CERTIFIED
AS THE REPRESENTATIVE OF COVERED EMPLOYEES IN A PARTNERSHIP UNIT
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-50-1106;
(j) A REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ASSOCIATION THAT REPRESENTS
BUSINESS, APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES; AND
(k) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SMALL BUSINESS COMMUNITY,
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE.
(3) (a) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL MAKE THEIR APPOINTMENTS TO THE TRANSITION
COMMITTEE AS SOON AS POSSIBLE AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION, BUT NO LATER THAN JUNE 23, 2026.
(b) IN APPOINTING MEMBERS TO THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE, THE
APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO CONSIDER
APPOINTING MEMBERS THAT, ALONG WITH MEETING THE BOARD'S SPECIFIED
MEMBERSHIP REQUIREMENTS, REFLECT THE GEOGRAPHIC AND DEMOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY OF THE ENTIRE STATE, INCLUDING MEMBERS FROM BOTH RURAL
AND URBAN PARTS OF THE STATE; MEMBERS OF DIVERSE POLITICAL, RACIAL,
DISABILITY, AND CULTURAL GROUPS; AND MEMBERS OF DIVERSE SEXUAL
ORIENTATIONS AND GENDERS.
(c) TO INFORM THE WORK OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE, AND TO
ENSURE CRITICAL STAKEHOLDERS HAVE THE OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE
FEEDBACK ON WHAT A SYSTEM OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT
MUST DELIVER FOR COLORADO, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTORS OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, AND THE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND
INTERNATIONAL TRADE, AND THE DIRECTOR OF OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION
MAY GATHER FEEDBACK FROM STAKEHOLDERS THROUGH MEETINGS HELD
SEPARATELY FROM TRANSITION COMMITTEE MEETINGS, INCLUDING
THROUGH MEETINGS HELD PRIOR TO THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE'S FIRST
MEETING.
(d) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE CHAIR OF THE TRANSITION
COMMITTEE FROM AMONG THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE'S MEMBERS. THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL APPOINT THE
VICE-CHAIR OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE FROM AMONG THE TRANSITION
COMMITTEE'S MEMBERS.
(e) MEMBERS OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SERVE WITHOUT
COMPENSATION AND WITHOUT REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES.
(4) (a) THE CHAIR OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SHALL CONVENE
THE FIRST MEETING OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE NO LATER THAN JULY
1, 2026.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

(b) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE EACH
MONTH UNTIL THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SUBMITS THE TRANSITION PLAN
TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38-303. THE
CHAIR MAY CALL ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS NECESSARY FOR THE
TRANSITION COMMITTEE TO COMPLETE ITS DUTIES. THE COMMITTEE IS NOT
REQUIRED TO MEET AFTER IT SUBMITS THE TRANSITION PLAN TO THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE.
(c) MEMBERS OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE MAY PARTICIPATE
REMOTELY IN TRANSITION COMMITTEE MEETINGS.
(d) THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE STAFF ASSISTANCE,
INCLUDING ASSISTING THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE WITH PREPARING THE
TRANSITION PLAN AND PROVIDING MEETING SPACE AND AUDIOVISUAL
COMMUNICATION TECHNOLOGY RESOURCES TO ASSIST IN COMPLETING THE
DUTIES OF THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE.
(5) (a) IN CARRYING OUT ITS DUTIES, THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE
SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, ENGAGE WITH INTERESTED AND
AFFECTED INDIVIDUALS IN ALL AREAS OF THE STATE AND ACROSS A WIDE
VARIETY OF PROGRAM TYPES, AND SHALL ACTIVELY SEEK INPUT AND
GUIDANCE FROM:
(I) EMPLOYEES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION, THE
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT, AND ANY OTHER AFFECTED
STATE DEPARTMENT;
(II) EMPLOYERS; WORKFORCE CENTER EMPLOYEES AND
PARTICIPANTS; COMMUNITY-BASED WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
ORGANIZATIONS; REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS AND
APPRENTICES;
(III) THE STATE REHABILITATION COUNCIL ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT, AND PARTICIPANTS IN
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN PART 1 OF ARTICLE
84 OF TITLE 8;
(IV) EMPLOYEES OF PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION,
INCLUDING FACULTY, INSTRUCTORS, AND STAFF, AND LABOR
ORGANIZATIONS THAT REPRESENT WORKERS IN PUBLIC HIGHER EDUCATION;
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

AND
(V) STUDENTS ENROLLED IN POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION AND
TRAINING PROGRAMS AT PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION,
INCLUDING AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES, COMMUNITY COLLEGES, AND
UNIVERSITIES; AND FACULTY, STUDENTS, STUDENT ORGANIZATIONS, AND
OTHER INTERESTED PARTIES FROM PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
(b) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SHALL CONSULT WITH EMPLOYEES
OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ABOUT DEPARTMENTAL OPERATIONS
CONSIDERATIONS.
24-38-303. Transition plan - required study by transition
advisory committee.
(1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 30, 2026, THE TRANSITION
COMMITTEE SHALL SUBMIT A TRANSITION PLAN TO THE JOINT BUDGET
COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES BUSINESS AFFAIRS AND
LABOR COMMITTEE; THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES EDUCATION
COMMITTEE; THE SENATE BUSINESS, LABOR, AND TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE;
AND THE SENATE EDUCATION COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEES.
(2) (a) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS
FOR THE STRUCTURE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AS A
DEPARTMENT THAT OVERSEES A SYSTEM OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT
DEVELOPMENT THAT INTEGRATES POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL,
TRAINING, AND EMPLOYMENT RESOURCES FOR COLORADANS, INCLUDING:
(I) GOVERNANCE MODELS FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, WITH CONSIDERATION FOR THE EXISTING ROLE AND STRUCTURE
OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION ESTABLISHED IN
SECTION 23-1-102 AND THE STATE WORK FORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL
CREATED IN SECTION 24-46.3-101;
(II) THE TECHNOLOGY AND STAFFING NEEDS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
HIGHER EDUCATION;
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

(III) DATA COLLECTION AND ANALYSIS SYSTEMS NECESSARY OR
BENEFICIAL FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(IV) RENAMING THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO
REFLECT ITS MISSION, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028, TO OVERSEE A SYSTEM OF
POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT; AND
(V) THE TIMELINE FOR COMPLETING THE TRANSITION OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO A DEPARTMENT THAT OVERSEES A
SYSTEM OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT.
(b) THE TRANSITION PLAN MUST INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS
ABOUT HOW THE FOLLOWING OFFICES, AGENCIES, PROGRAMS, AND
FUNCTIONS TRANSITION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION:
(I) THE PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED BY THE DIVISION OF EMPLOYMENT
AND TRAINING, CREATED IN SECTION 8-83-102, WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT;
(II) THE STATE'S DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER AND FOR
IMPLEMENTING TITLES I, II, AND III OF THE FEDERAL "WORKFORCE
INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT", 29 U.S.C. SEC. 3101 ET SEQ.;
(III) THE DETERMINATIONS RELATED TO INTERNATIONAL STANDARD
CLASSIFICATION OF EDUCATION FOR APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-83-1002;
(IV) DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES RELATED TO REGIONAL TALENT
DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVES, INCLUDING THE REGIONAL TALENT SUMMIT
GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-704 AND, IF CONTINUED
BEYOND JULY 1, 2028, THE REGIONAL TALENT DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE
GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-405, COMMONLY KNOWN AS
OPPORTUNITY NOW COLORADO GRANTS, AND ANY SUBSEQUENT PROGRAMS
THAT PROVIDE GRANTS TO SUPPORT REGIONAL TALENT DEVELOPMENT
INITIATIVES;
(V) ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY PROGRAMS DESCRIBED IN
ARTICLE 10 OF TITLE 22, INCLUDING THE ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY
GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION 22-10-104, AND THE DUTY TO
CONVENE MEETINGS TO DISCUSS THE STATE'S WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

NEEDS AND THE LEVELS OF UNMET NEED FOR ADULT EDUCATION WITHIN THE
STATE, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-10-106;
(VI) THE COLORADO OFFICE OF NEW AMERICANS CREATED IN
SECTION 8-3.7-103; AND
(VII) THE COLORADO DISABILITY OPPORTUNITY OFFICE CREATED IN
SECTION 8-88-102.
(c) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIDER AND INCLUDE
RECOMMENDATIONS IN THE TRANSITION PLAN ABOUT HOW THE DEPARTMENT
OF HIGHER EDUCATION WILL COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION'S POSTSECONDARY WORKFORCE READINESS AND STUDENT
SUPPORT ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIPS FOR YOUTH
AND PRE-APPRENTICESHIP, WORK-BASED LEARNING, OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME
PROGRAMS THAT PROVIDE CAREER-CONNECTED LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES,
AND POSTSECONDARY CREDENTIAL PROGRAMS.
(3) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE MAY CONSIDER AND INCLUDE
RECOMMENDATIONS IN THE TRANSITION PLAN ABOUT:
(a) STRATEGIES TO SUPPORT ADULT LEARNERS SEEKING
FOUNDATIONAL SKILLS AND CREDENTIALS, SUCH AS A HIGH SCHOOL
DIPLOMA OR EQUIVALENT, AND POSTSECONDARY CREDENTIAL ATTAINMENT.
(b) THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP AGENCY CREATED IN SECTION
8-15.7-102, INCLUDING RECOMMENDATIONS THAT MAINTAIN THE
CONNECTION BETWEEN THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP AGENCY AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT;
(c) THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP COUNCIL ESTABLISHED IN SECTION
8-15.7-105;
(d) THE COLORADO STATE APPRENTICESHIP RESOURCE DIRECTORY
CREATED IN SECTION 8-83-308;
(e) RELOCATING THE OFFICE OF FUTURE OF WORK, CREATED IN
SECTION 8-15.8-103, TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR
DISCONTINUING THE OFFICE OF FUTURE OF WORK;
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

(f) RELOCATING THE STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY ESTABLISHED IN
SECTION 24-80-201 AND COMMONLY KNOWN AS HISTORY COLORADO;
(g) RELOCATING THE OFFICE OF LABOR MARKET INFORMATION
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT;
(h) THE GOVERNANCE OF AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES, AS DEFINED
IN SECTION 23-60-103; IMPROVING THE AVAILABILITY OF OCCUPATIONAL
EDUCATION, INCLUDING REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIPS FOR YOUTH AND
WORK-BASED LEARNING PATHWAYS; AND ENABLING AREA TECHNICAL
COLLEGES TO BEST DELIVER OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION AND SUPPORT
SECONDARY-TO-POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION TRANSITIONS IN COLORADO;
AND
(i) STRATEGIES TO SUPPORT ADULT POSTSECONDARY CREDENTIAL
ATTAINMENT, INCLUDING STRATEGIES TO SUPPORT ADULT LEARNERS IN
ACCESSING AND COMPLETING HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMAS AND CONNECTING
WITH ADDITIONAL EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND EMPLOYMENT
OPPORTUNITIES.
(4) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE MAY CONSIDER HOW THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT
TO PART 3 OF ARTICLE 2 OF TITLE 26; STATE ADMINISTRATION OF THE
PROGRAM TO PROVIDE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 26-2-703 (19); AND OTHER PROGRAMS ADMINISTERED
BY THE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC SECURITY IN THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES ARE ALIGNED WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION'S
MISSION, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028, TO OVERSEE A SYSTEM OF
POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT. THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE MAY
INCLUDE IN THE TRANSITION PLAN A RECOMMENDATION FOR THE PROGRAMS
TO COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(5) IN PREPARING THE TRANSITION PLAN, THE TRANSITION
COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIDER STRATEGIES TO:
(a) ELIMINATE DUPLICATIVE OVERSIGHT OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS;
(b) CONTINUE EFFORTS TO ALIGN THE POSTSECONDARY TALENT
DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM, INCLUDING STRATEGIES TO REDUCE BUREAUCRACY
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

AND ENSURE ALIGNMENT WITH RELATED PROGRAMS THAT ARE NOT
ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS
RECOMMENDED BY THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE;
(c) ALIGN POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES AMONG THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND EXISTING
STATE AGENCIES; AND
(d) ENSURE THE QUALITY OF EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND
EMPLOYMENT PROGRAMS, INCLUDING BY MEASURING KEY OUTCOMES OF THE
PROGRAMS AND MAKING THE OUTCOMES MORE TRANSPARENT AND EASY TO
UNDERSTAND FOR PROSPECTIVE PARTICIPANTS.
(6) THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE SHALL NOT INCLUDE IN THE
TRANSITION PLAN ANY RECOMMENDATION THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH OR,
IF IMPLEMENTED, WOULD:
(a) BE INCONSISTENT WITH OR WOULD RESULT IN A VIOLATION OF
FEDERAL LAW OR RULE, INCLUDING THE REQUIREMENTS FOR STATE
APPRENTICESHIP AGENCIES IN 29 CFR 29.13;
(b) CHANGE THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY FOR, OR MEMBERSHIP OF,
THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP COUNCIL, CREATED IN SECTION 8-15.7-105; THE
COMMITTEE FOR APPRENTICESHIP IN NEW AND EMERGING INDUSTRIES,
CREATED IN SECTION 8-15.7-104; OR THE COMMITTEE FOR APPRENTICESHIP
IN THE BUILDING AND CONSTRUCTION TRADES, CREATED IN SECTION
8-15.7-103;
(c) CHANGE THE STATE APPRENTICESHIP AGENCY'S STATUS AS A
TYPE 1 ENTITY; OR
(d) CHANGE THE COLORADO OFFICE OF NEW AMERICANS' OR
COLORADO DISABILITY OPPORTUNITY OFFICE'S STATUSES AS TYPE 1 ENTITIES
OR THE OFFICES' REGULAR ACCESS TO THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR AND
POWER TO CONVENE OTHER STATE AGENCIES.
24-38-304. Funding - in-kind donations.
(1) THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3. THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE MAY ACCEPT DONATIONS
OF IN-KIND SERVICES FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3, INCLUDING FOR
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.
(2) THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE AND THE TRANSITION COMMITTEE
SHALL CARRY OUT THIS PART 3 WITHIN EXISTING APPROPRIATIONS.
24-38-305. Repeal of part.
THIS PART 3 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-1-114, amend (1),
(2), and (5)(b); and add (1.1) and (1.5) as follows:
24-1-114. Department of higher education - creation - mission
- legislative intent - definitions.
(1) There is hereby created a THE department of higher education,
the head of which shall be IS the executive director of the Colorado
commission on higher education DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION, who
shall be IS appointed by the governor and whose powers and duties are as
specified in this section.
(1.1) (a) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT'S MISSION IS TO
OVERSEE A SYSTEM OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT THAT
INTEGRATES POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL, TRAINING, AND EMPLOYMENT
RESOURCES FOR COLORADANS. IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
TO EVALUATE THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE POSTSECONDARY TALENT
DEVELOPMENT SYSTEM TRANSITION ADVISORY COMMITTEE CREATED IN
SECTION 24-38-302, MAKE ANY NECESSARY STATUTORY CHANGES TO
EFFECTUATE THE EXPANSION OF THE DEPARTMENT'S MISSION TO OVERSEE A
SYSTEM OF POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT, AND RENAME THE
DEPARTMENT ACCORDINGLY.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (1.1) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2029.
(1.5) (a) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(I) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

EDUCATION CREATED IN SECTION 23-1-102.
(II) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER
EDUCATION.
(III) "EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR" MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) (I) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION IS RENAMED THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(II) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, AS USED IN EVERY STATUTE,
UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS THE "EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION".
(III) THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IS AUTHORIZED TO CHANGE ALL
REFERENCES IN THE COLORADO REVISED STATUTES TO THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION, AS
APPROPRIATE.
(2) The Colorado commission on higher education and the office of
executive director of the commission DEPARTMENT, created in article 1 of
title 23, are type 1 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise
their powers and perform their duties and functions under the department.
of higher education.
(5) (b) With respect to the Colorado commission on higher
education and the universities, colleges, and boards specified in subsection
(4) of this section, the executive director has only those powers, duties, and
functions prescribed in article 1 of title 23; except that the executive
director of the Colorado commission on higher education is authorized to
negotiate, implement, and monitor contracts, as described in sections
23-18-201 (2), 23-18-303.5, and 23-18-304, with universities, colleges, and
boards, in consultation with the Colorado commission on higher education.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-101.1, amend (3)
as follows:
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

23-1-101.1. Definitions.
As used in this article 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Executive director" means the office of the executive director
of the Colorado commission on higher education created and existing
pursuant to section 24-1-114, C.R.S. DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-110, repeal (2)(a),
(3), and (4); and add (2)(c) as follows:
23-1-110. Organization, meetings, and staff - repeal.
(2) (a) The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate,
an executive director qualified by substantial training and experience in the
field of higher education. The executive director shall be the executive
officer of the commission and the department, shall serve at the pleasure of
the governor, and shall receive compensation commensurate with the duties
of the office as determined by the governor. The duties and responsibilities
of the executive director shall be discharged in accordance with the policies,
procedures, and directives of the commission and the department. The
executive director shall employ such professional and clerical personnel as
deemed necessary to carry out the duties and functions of the commission
and the department. Offices held by the executive director and professional
personnel are declared to be educational in nature and not under the state
personnel system.
(c) (I) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028, IN HOUSE BILL 26-1317, ENACTED
IN 2026, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON
HIGHER EDUCATION IS RENAMED THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2029.
(3) The executive director shall conduct all studies and programs of
the commission and coordinate such studies and programs with those of
other state agencies having duties and functions concerned with higher
education, so as to avoid duplication of programs and staff.
(4) The executive director shall review and approve or deny any
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

proposed action or recommendation of the private occupational school
board acting pursuant to article 64 of this title 23.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 1.1 to title
23 as follows:
ARTICLE 1.1
Department of Higher Education
23-1.1-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 1.1, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
CREATED IN SECTION 24-1-114.
(2) "EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR" MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT.
23-1.1-102. Department structure - mission - duties.
(1) (a) THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS CREATED IN
SECTION 24-1-114. THE DEPARTMENT'S MISSION IS TO OVERSEE A SYSTEM OF
POSTSECONDARY TALENT DEVELOPMENT THAT INTEGRATES
POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL, TRAINING, AND EMPLOYMENT RESOURCES
FOR COLORADANS.
(b) PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-1-114, THE HEAD OF THE DEPARTMENT
IS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT CONSISTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND THE DIVISIONS, SECTIONS, OTHER UNITS, AND ADVISORY
BOARDS AS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY ESTABLISH; AS MAY BE SPECIFIED
IN THIS TITLE 23; AND AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-1-114.
(3) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY ESTABLISH DIVISIONS, SECTIONS,
OTHER UNITS, AND ADVISORY BOARDS WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT AS THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR DETERMINES ARE NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER AND
EFFICIENT DISCHARGE OF THE POWERS, DUTIES, AND FUNCTIONS OF THE
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

DEPARTMENT.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ADMINISTERING THE
FUNCTIONS AND PROGRAMS AS SET FORTH IN THIS TITLE 23 AND AS
OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW.
23-1.1-103. Executive director of the department - appointment
- duties - repeal.
(1) (a) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT, WITH THE CONSENT OF THE
SENATE, AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR QUALIFIED BY SUBSTANTIAL TRAINING
AND EXPERIENCE IN THE FIELD OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR IS THE EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF
THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT, SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
GOVERNOR, AND MUST RECEIVE COMPENSATION COMMENSURATE WITH THE
DUTIES OF THE OFFICE AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNOR. THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR SHALL DISCHARGE THEIR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND DIRECTIVES OF THE
COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL
EMPLOY PROFESSIONAL AND CLERICAL PERSONNEL AS THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR DEEMS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS OF
THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT. OFFICES HELD BY THE EXECUTIVE
DIRECTOR AND PROFESSIONAL PERSONNEL ARE DECLARED TO BE
EDUCATIONAL IN NATURE AND NOT UNDER THE STATE PERSONNEL SYSTEM.
(b) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER
EDUCATION ON JUNE 30, 2028, BECOMES THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION ON JULY 1, 2028, UNLESS THE
GOVERNOR APPOINTS A DIFFERENT PERSON TO ASSUME THE OFFICE OF THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
EFFECTIVE ON JULY 1, 2028.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 31,
2035.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR HAS THE POWERS, DUTIES, AND
FUNCTIONS PRESCRIBED IN ARTICLE 1 OF TITLE 24 FOR HEADS OF PRINCIPAL
DEPARTMENTS, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-1-114, AND HAS THE POWERS,
DUTIES, AND FUNCTIONS SET FORTH IN STATE LAW.
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

(3) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL CONDUCT ALL STUDIES AND
PROGRAMS OF THE COMMISSION AND COORDINATE THE STUDIES AND
PROGRAMS WITH THOSE OF OTHER STATE AGENCIES HAVING DUTIES AND
FUNCTIONS CONCERNED WITH HIGHER EDUCATION, SO AS TO AVOID
DUPLICATION OF PROGRAMS AND STAFF.
(4) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL REVIEW AND APPROVE OR DENY
ANY PROPOSED ACTION OR RECOMMENDATION OF THE PRIVATE
OCCUPATIONAL SCHOOL BOARD ACTING PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 64 OF THIS
TITLE 23.
SECTION 7. Effective date. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, this act takes effect upon passage.
(2) Sections 4 and 6 of this act take effect July 1, 2028.
(3) Section 24-1-114 (1), (1.5), (2), and (5)(b), Colorado Revised
Statutes, amended in section 3 of this act, takes effect July 1, 2028.
(4) Section 23-1-110 (2)(a), (3), and (4), Colorado Revised Statutes,
amended in section 5 of this act, takes effect July 1, 2028.
SECTION 8. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1317

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1317